en: Puffed lentil cakes
de: Linsenwaffeln
es: Tortitas de lentejas infladas
fr: Galettes de lentilles soufflées
hr: Kolačići od lisnate leće
it: Galetti di lenticchie soffiate
nl: Linzenwafels
pt: Geletes de lentilha

en: Rice paper
de: Reispapier
es: Obleas de arroz
fi: Riisipaperi
fr: Galettes de riz pour rouleau de printemps
hr: Rižin papir
ja: ライスペーパー
pl: Papier ryżowy

en: Puffed cereal cakes
ca: Pastissos de cereals inflats
de: gepuffte Getreidewaffeln
es: Tortitas de cereales
fr: Galettes de céréales soufflées, galettes de céréales
hr: Lisnati kolači od žitarica
hu: Puffasztott gabonakészítmények
it: Gallette di cereali soffiati, gallette di cereali
nl: Graanwafels
ru: Воздушные хлопья

en: Puffed multigrain cakes, Puffed cereals textured bread
de: Gepuffte Mehrkornwaffeln, Gepuffte Vollkornkuchen
es: Tortitas multicereales, Tortitas de varios cereales
fr: Galettes multicéréales soufflées, Galettes muticéréales
hr: Dizane višezrnate pogače
it: Torte di multicereali soffiati
nl: Meergranen wafels

en: Puffed corn cakes
de: gepuffte Maiswaffeln
es: Tortitas de maíz
fi: maissikakut
fr: Galettes de maïs soufflé, galettes de maïs
hr: Lisnati kukuruzni kolačići
hu: Puffasztott kukorica készítményak
it: Gallette di mais
nl: Maïswafels, Maiswafels

en: Puffed corn cakes with black chocolate
de: Gepuffte Maiswaffeln mit Bitterschokolade, Gepuffte Maiskuchen mit Bitterschokolade
es: Tortitas de maíz con chocolate negro
fr: Galettes de maïs au chocolat noir
hr: Lisnati kukuruzni kolačići s crnom čokoladom
nl: Maiswafels met pure chocolade

en: Puffed corn cakes with milk chocolate
de: Gepuffte Maiswaffeln mit Milchschokolade, Gepuffte Maiskuchen mit Milchschoklade
es: Tortitas de maíz con chocolate con leche
fr: Galettes de maïs au chocolat au lait
hr: Lisnati kukuruzni kolačići s mliječnom čokoladom
hu: Puffasztott kukoricafekete csokoládéval
nl: Maiswafels met melkchocolade

en: Puffed rice cakes
de: gepuffte Reiswaffeln
es: Tortitas de arroz
fi: riisikakut
fr: Galettes de riz soufflé, galettes de riz
he: עוגות אורז תפוח
hr: Lisnati kolačići od riže
hu: Puffasztott rizs
it: Gallette di riso soffiato, Gallette di riso
nl: Rijstwafels
pl: Wafle ryżowe

en: Puffed wholegrain rice cakes, Puffed rice textured bread wholemeal
de: Gepuffte Vollkornreiswaffeln, Gepuffte Vollkornreiskuchen
es: Tortitas de arroz integral
fi: Täysjyväriisikakut
fr: Galettes de riz complet soufflé, galettes de riz complet, Galettes de riz soufflé complet
hr: Lisnati kolačići od cjelovite riže
it: Gallette di riso integrale
nl: Volkoren rijstwafels
pl: Pełnoziarniste wafle ryżowe

en: Puffed rice cakes with black chocolate
de: gepuffte Reiswaffeln mit Bitterschokolade
es: Tortitas de arroz con chocolate negro
fr: Galettes de riz au chocolat noir
hr: Kolačići od lisnate riže s crnom čokoladom
it: Torte di riso soffiato con cioccolato nero
nl: Pure chocolade rijstwafels

en: Puffed rice cakes with milk chocolate
de: gepuffte Reiswaffeln mit Milchschokolade
es: Tortitas de arroz con chocolate con leche
fr: Galettes de riz au chocolat au lait
hr: Lisnate riže s mliječnom čokoladom
nl: Rijstwafels met melkchocolade

en: Puffed rice cakes with white chocolate
de: Gepuffte Reiswaffeln mit weißer Schokolade, Gepuffte Reiskuchen mit weißer Schokolade
es: Tortitas de arroz con chocolate blanco
fr: Galettes de riz au chocolat blanc
hr: Lisnate riže s bijelom čokoladom
nl: Witte chocolade rijstwafels

en: Puffed rice cakes with yogurt
es: Tortitas de arroz con yogur
fr: Galettes de riz au yaourt
hr: Kolačići od lisnate riže s jogurtom

en: Puffed oat cakes
de: Gepuffte Haferwaffeln, Gepuffte Haferkuchen
es: Tortitas de avena
fr: Galettes d'avoine soufflé, galettes d'avoine
hr: Kolači od lisnate zobi
it: Gallette di avena soffiata, Gallette di avena
nl: Haverwafels

en: Puffed rye cakes
fr: Galettes de seigle soufflé
hr: Lisnati raženi kolači
it: Gallette di segale soffiata

en: Puffed sorghum cakes
fr: Galettes de sorgo soufflé
hr: Lisnati kolačići od sirka
it: Gallette di sorgo soffiato

en: Puffed buckwheat cakes
fr: Galettes de sarrasin soufflé
hr: Lisnati kolačići od heljde
it: Gallette di grano saraceno soffiato

en: Puffed wheat cakes
de: gepuffte Weizenwaffeln
es: Tortitas de trigo
fr: Galettes de blé soufflé, galettes de blé
hr: Lisnati pšenični kolači
it: Gallette di grano soffiato, Torte di grano soffiato
nl: Tarwewafels

en: Puffed spelt cakes
de: Gepuffte Dinkelwaffeln, Gepuffte Dinkelkuchen
es: Tortitas de espelta
fr: Galettes d'épeautre soufflé, galettes d'épeautre
hr: Lisnati kolačići od pira
nl: Speltwafels

en: Puffed Khorasan wheat cakes, Puffed Kamut cakes
de: Kamutwaffeln
es: Tortitas de trigo de Jorasán, Tortitas de Kamut
fr: Galettes de blé khorasan soufflé, galettes de blé khorasan, Galettes de blé de Khorasan, Galettes de Kamut
hr: Lisnati khorasan pšenični kolači
it: Gallette di grano Khorasan soffiato, Torte di grano Khorasan soffiato
nl: Kamutwafels